Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
SUBCHAPTER 26. Financing of Existing Industry Development

154.26-010.
Definitions for Subchapter 26 of KRS Chapter 154.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Agreement” means a revitalization agreement entered into, pursuant to KRS 154.26-090, on behalf of the authority and an approved company with respect to an economic revitalization project;

“Agribusiness” means any activity involving the processing of raw agricultural products, including timber, or the providing of value-added functions with regard to raw agricultural products;

“Appropriation agreement” means an agreement entered into, pursuant to KRS 154.26-090(1)(f)2., among the approved company, the authority, and local governmental entities with respect to appropriations by these local governmental entities for the benefit of the approved company;

“Approved company” means any eligible company approved by the authority pursuant to KRS 154.26-080 requiring an economic revitalization project;

“Approved costs” means:

Obligations incurred for labor and to vendors, contractors, subcontractors, builders, suppliers, deliverymen, and materialmen in connection with the acquisition, construction, equipping, rehabilitation, and installation of an economic revitalization project;

The cost of contract bonds and of insurance of all kinds that may be required or necessary during the course of acquisition, construction, equipping, rehabilitation, and installation of an economic revitalization project which is not paid by the vendor, supplier, deliveryman, contractor, or otherwise provided;

All costs of architectural and engineering services, including estimates, plans and specifications, preliminary investigations, and supervision of construction, rehabilitation and installation, as well as for the performance of all the duties required by or consequent upon the acquisition, construction, equipping, rehabilitation, and installation of an economic revitalization project;

All costs required to be paid under the terms of any contract for the acquisition, construction, equipping, rehabilitation, and installation of an economic revitalization project;

All costs required for the installation of utilities, including but not limited to water, sewer, sewer treatment, gas, electricity, communications, and railroads, and including off-site construction of the facilities paid for by the approved company; and

All other costs comparable with those described above;

“Assessment” means the job revitalization assessment fee authorized by KRS 154.26-100;

“Authority” means the Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority created by KRS 154.20-010;

“Commonwealth” means the Commonwealth of Kentucky;

“Economic revitalization project” or “project”:

Means the acquisition, construction, equipping, and rehabilitation of machinery and equipment, constituting fixtures or otherwise, and with respect thereto, the construction, rehabilitation, and installation of improvements of facilities necessary or desirable for the acquisition, construction, installation, and rehabilitation of the machinery and equipment, including surveys; installation of utilities, including water, sewer, sewage treatment, gas, electricity, communications, and similar facilities; and off-site construction of utility extensions to the boundaries of the real estate on which the facilities are located, all of which are utilized to improve the economic situation of the approved company to allow the approved company to remain in operation and retain or create jobs or to resume operations in the case of closed facilities as provided in subsection (10)(b) of this section; and

Includes any supplemental project;

“Eligible company” means any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, limited partnership, sole proprietorship, business trust, or any other entity:

Employing or intending to employ full-time a minimum of twenty-five (25) persons engaged in manufacturing or agribusiness operations at the same facility, whether acquired, owned, or leased, located and operating within the Commonwealth on a permanent basis for a reasonable period of time preceding the request for approval by the authority of an economic revitalization project, including facilities where manufacturing or agribusiness operations has been temporarily suspended and which meets the standards promulgated by the authority pursuant to KRS 154.26-080; or

Having or, in the case of closed facilities, intending, raw production of at least three (3) million tons of coal mined from the economic revitalization project facility and employing or, in the case of closed facilities, intending to employ, a minimum of five hundred (500) persons engaged in coal mining and processing operations at facilities, whether owned or leased, located and operating within the Commonwealth on a permanent basis for a reasonable period of time preceding the request for approval by the authority of an economic revitalization project, including facilities on or adjacent to where coal mining and processing operations have been closed, temporarily suspended, or severely reduced, and which meets the standards promulgated by the authority under KRS 154.26-080;

“Final approval” means the action taken by the authority authorizing the eligible company to receive inducements under this subchapter;

“Inducements” means the Kentucky tax credit and the job revitalization assessment fee as prescribed in KRS 154.26-090 and 154.26-100;

“Manufacturing” means any activity involving the manufacturing, processing, assembling, or production of any property, including the processing that results in a change in the condition of the property and any related activity or function, together with the storage, warehousing, distribution, and related office facilities;

“Coal mining and processing” means activities resulting in the eligible company being subject to the tax imposed by KRS Chapter 143;

“Preliminary approval” means the action taken by the authority conditioning final approval by the authority upon satisfaction by the eligible company of the requirements under this subchapter;

“State agency” means any state administrative body, agency, department, or division as defined in KRS 42.010, or any board, commission, institution, or division exercising any function of the state which is not an independent municipal corporation or political subdivision;

“Supplemental project” means an additional investment in an approved economic revitalization project proposed during, or within sixty (60) months after the expiration of, the initial term of an agreement, and which may be approved by the authority for additional inducements as set forth in KRS 154.26-090;

“Kentucky gross profits” means Kentucky gross profits as defined in KRS 141.0401;

“Kentucky gross receipts” means Kentucky gross receipts as defined in KRS 141.0401; and

“Supplemental project agreement” means an agreement, entered into pursuant to KRS 154.26-090, on behalf of the authority and an approved company with respect to a supplemental project.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 359, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 390, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 450, § 21, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 499, § 23, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 45, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 547, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 153, § 1, effective March 20, 2001; 2004, ch. 18, § 6, effective July 13, 2004; 2004, ch. 105, § 22, effective July 13, 2004; 2006, ch. 149, § 219, effective July 12, 2006; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 56, effective June 28, 2006; 2007, ch. 71, § 1, effective March 23, 2007; 2012, ch. 119, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 129, § 2, effective July 15, 2014; 2016 ch. 109, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

154.26-015.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds and declares that the general welfare and material well-being of the citizens of the Commonwealth depends in large measure upon the revitalization and development of industry in the Commonwealth, and that it is in the best interest of the Commonwealth to induce the revitalization of existing manufacturing or agribusiness facilities within the Commonwealth in order to advance the public purposes of relieving unemployment by preserving and creating jobs that would not exist if not for the inducements to be offered by the authority to approved companies, and by preserving and creating sources of tax revenues for the support of public services provided by the Commonwealth; and that the authority prescribed by KRS 154.26-015 to 154.26-100, and the purposes to be accomplished under the provisions of KRS 154.26-015 to 154.26-100 are proper governmental and public purposes for which public moneys may be expended, and that the inducement of the creation of projects is of paramount importance mandating that the provisions of KRS 154.26-015 to 154.26-100 be liberally construed and applied in order to advance public purposes.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 359, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 390, § 7, effective July 15, 1994.

154.26-020.
Kentucky Industrial Revitalization Authority. [Repealed.]

154.26-030.
Powers of authority. [Repealed.]

154.26-040.
Staff of authority.

The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development shall provide sufficient personnel to serve as staff for the authority in order to permit the authority to adequately discharge its duties and responsibilities prescribed in KRS 154.26-015 to 154.26-100.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 359, § 5, effective July 14, 1992.

154.26-050.
Personal liability of director or officer.

No director or officer of the authority shall be subject to any personal liability or accountability by reason of his execution of any obligation duly authorized by the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 359, § 6, effective July 14, 1992.

154.26-060.
Funding for authority.

The authority may accept and expend moneys which may be appropriated from time to time by the General Assembly, or moneys which may be received from any source, including income from the authority’s operations for effectuating its purpose, including, without limitation, the payment of the expenses of administration and operation.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 359, § 7, effective July 14, 1992.

154.26-070.
Interest in contract with authority by director, officer, or employee.

No director, officer, or employee of the authority shall be interested, directly or indirectly, or shall be an officer or employee, or have an ownership interest in any firm or corporation interested, directly or indirectly, in any contract with the authority.

Should a director, officer, or employee of the authority have such an interest or be an officer or employee of or have an ownership interest in any such firm or corporation, then the director, officer, or employee of the authority shall:

Disclose the interest and the office, employment, or ownership in the firm or corporation;

Refrain from participating in discussions relating to any contract of the firm or corporation with the authority; and

Refrain from voting or otherwise taking action on any contract or proposed contract of the authority with the firm or corporation.

If any contract or agreement shall be made in violation of the provisions of this section, it shall be null and void and no action shall be maintained against the authority.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 359, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 23, effective July 15, 1994.

154.26-080.
Standards for determination of eligibility — Review of application — Request for emergency declaration — Authorizing resolution — Application for
and approval of supplemental projects — Meetings.

The authority shall establish standards for the determination and approval of eligible companies and their projects by the promulgation of administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A.

The criteria for approval of eligible companies and economic revitalization projects or supplemental projects shall include but not be limited to the:

Need for the project;

New capital investment in the project or supplemental project that will result in financial stability for the manufacturing or coal mining and processing facility; and

Retention or expansion of the greatest number of employees at the manufacturing or coal mining and processing facility.

With respect to each eligible company making an application to the authority for inducements, and with respect to the project described in the application, the authority shall make inquiries and request materials of the applicant, including but not limited to written evidence that except for a substantial investment in the project, assisted by the inducements authorized by KRS 154.26-015 to 154.26-100, the eligible company will:

Close its manufacturing or coal mining and processing facility; and

Permanently lay off its employees and cease operations; or

Not resume operations of a closed facility as permitted by KRS 154.26-010(9).

The eligible company shall, in a manner acceptable to the authority, detail the condition of the facility, including but not limited to financial, efficiency, and productivity matters; explain in detail why the company intends to close the facility or not resume operations of the facility as permitted by KRS 154.26-010(9); and set out alternatives that are available to the company.

As a part of its application, an eligible company as described in KRS 154.26-010(10)(b) may request an emergency declaration based upon the urgency of the request and its impact on the local or regional economy.

A request for an emergency declaration shall be reviewed by the secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development, the secretary of the Education and Workforce Development Cabinet, and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet and their findings in connection with the emergency declaration shall be delivered to the authority.

If the emergency declaration is granted in accordance with subsection (6) of this section, the eligible company shall not be subject to the requirements contained in subsection (8), (9), or (11) of this section.

In accordance with, and after the adoption of a resolution under subsection (10) of this section, the authority shall engage the services of a competent consulting firm or technical resource to analyze the data made available by the company, and to collect and analyze additional information necessary to determine that, in the independent judgment of the consultant, the company will close the facility or not resume operations of the facility as permitted by KRS 154.26-010(9) absent a substantial investment in the project, assisted by the inducements authorized by KRS 154.26-015 to 154.26-100. The company shall pay the cost of this evaluation.

The company shall cooperate with the consultant and provide all of the data which could reasonably be required by the consultant to make a fair assessment of the company’s intentions to close the facility or not resume operations of the facility as permitted by KRS 154.26-010(9).

After a review of relevant materials and completion of inquiries, the authority may, by resolution, give its preliminary approval by designating an eligible company as a preliminarily-approved company and authorizing the undertaking of the economic revitalization project.

The authority shall review the report of the consultant and other information which has been made available to it in order to assist the authority in determining whether the company intends to close the facility for valid reasons or whether it intends or is able to resume operations of the facility in accordance with the requirements of KRS 154.26-010(10)(b) if inducements are granted. The authority shall determine the potential of the proposed revitalization project to make the facility stable, productive, and competitive in its market.

After the review of the consultant’s report or if an emergency declaration has been issued in accordance with subsection (6) of this section, the authority shall hold a public hearing to solicit public comment from any person, group, or interested party regarding the proposed project.

After the public hearing, the authority, by resolution, may:

Declare the jobs then existing at the facility to be lost or the company unable to resume operations as permitted by KRS 154.26-010(9);

Give its final approval to the eligible company’s application for a project; and

Grant to the eligible company the status of an approved company.

During the initial term of an agreement, or within sixty (60) months after the expiration of the term, an eligible company may apply for, and the authority may approve, a supplemental project when the applicant:
(14) (a)

During the initial term of an agreement, or within sixty (60) months after the expiration of the term, an eligible company may apply for, and the authority may approve, a supplemental project when the applicant:

Has expended approved costs of at least fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) on an approved economic revitalization project;

Employs a minimum of one hundred (100) employees at the site of the economic revitalization project;

Agrees to incur at least five million dollars ($5,000,000) in additional eligible costs for improvements to a blast furnace that:

Is located at the economic revitalization project;

Has burned at least one million (1,000,000) tons of Kentucky coal during the initial term of the agreement; and

Was idled due to unfairly traded imports of carbon steel, with resulting layoffs of more than five hundred fifty (550) employees; and

Is at risk of closure and carries a significant net loss carry forward for the last three (3) tax years as certified by the approved company.

The authority may approve a supplemental project by resolution, authorizing the execution of a supplemental project agreement.

All meetings of the authority shall be held in accordance with KRS 61.805 to 61.850. The authority may, pursuant to KRS 61.815, hold closed sessions of its meetings to discuss matters exempt from the open meetings law and pertaining to an eligible company.

The decision reached by the authority shall be final and no appeal shall be granted.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 359, § 9, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 24, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 499, § 25, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 46, effective July 15, 1996; 2001, ch. 153, § 2, effective March 20, 2001; 2006, ch. 211, § 74, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 71, § 2, effective March 23, 2007; 2009, ch. 11, § 42, effective June 25, 2009; 2012, ch. 119, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 129, § 3, effective July 15, 2014; 2016 ch. 109, § 2, effective July 15, 2016.

154.26-085.
Options for companies with preliminary approval or final agreement before July 13, 2004.

If, prior to July 13, 2004, the authority has given its preliminary approval designating an eligible company as a preliminarily approved company and authorizing the undertaking of an economic revitalization project, but has not entered into a final agreement with the company, the company shall have the one-time option to:

Operate under the existing agreement as preliminarily approved; or

Request the authority to amend the agreement to comply with the amendments to KRS 154.26-090, 154.26-100, and 141.310 in 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 105, secs. 12, 13, 14, and 21.

If, prior to July 13, 2004, the authority has entered into a final agreement with an eligible company, and if the final agreement is still in effect, the company shall have the one-time option to:

Operate under the existing final agreement; or

Request the authority to amend only the employee assessment portion of the final agreement to comply with the amendment to KRS 154.26-100 in 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 105, sec. 13.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 105, § 15, effective July 13, 2004; 2019 ch. 151, § 66, effective June 27, 2019.

154.26-087.
Final approval by authority restricted to eligible companies preliminarily approved on or before June 30, 2021.

If an eligible company has not received preliminary approval on or before June 30, 2021, the eligible company shall not receive final approval by the authority to become an approved company under this subchapter. Outstanding eligible companies with preliminary or final approval granted on or before June 30, 2021, shall continue to be governed by this subchapter and KRS 141.403.

HISTORY:
2021 ch. 185, § 130, effective June 29, 2021.

154.26-090.
Revitalization agreement — Amended agreement — Tax credits — Occupational license fee termination — Assessment fee — Effect of excess in assessments.

The authority, upon adoption of its final approval, may enter into, with any approved company, an agreement with respect to its project or a supplemental project agreement with respect to its supplemental project. The terms and provisions of each agreement and supplemental project agreement, including the amount of approved costs and any limitations the authority may deem necessary, shall be determined by negotiations between the authority and the approved company, except that each agreement and supplemental project agreement shall include the following provisions:

The amount the approved company may recover through inducements under this subchapter shall not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of approved costs;

The date by which the approved company will have completed the original project and supplemental project. Within three (3) months of the completion date of the original project or supplemental project, the approved company shall document the actual cost of the project or supplemental project in a manner acceptable to the authority. The authority may employ an independent consultant or utilize technical resources to verify the cost of the project or supplemental project. The approved company shall reimburse the authority for the cost of the consultant;

In consideration of the execution of the agreement or supplemental project agreement, the approved company may be permitted, during a period not to exceed ten (10) years commencing on the date of the agreement or supplemental project agreement and during which the agreement or supplemental project agreement is in effect, the following inducements:

A credit against the Kentucky tax imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040 on the income of the approved company generated by or arising out of the economic revitalization project or supplemental project, and a credit against the limited liability entity tax imposed by KRS 141.0401 on Kentucky gross profits or Kentucky gross receipts as determined under KRS 141.403. The ordering of credits shall be as provided in KRS 141.0205; and

The aggregate assessment withheld by the approved company in each year;

The tax credits allowed to the approved company shall be equal to the lesser of the total amount of the tax liability or the amount that the company may recover under paragraph (a) of this subsection that has not yet been recovered, reduced by any recovery through the collection of assessments and appropriations made under any appropriation agreement. The credit shall be allowed for each fiscal year of the approved company during the term of the agreement and for which a tax return of the approved company is filed until the amount that the company may recover under paragraph (a) of this subsection has been received through a combination of credits, assessments, if assessments are elected to be imposed, and appropriations made under any appropriation agreement. The approved company shall not be required to pay estimated tax payments as prescribed under KRS 141.044 or 141.305 on income, Kentucky gross profits or Kentucky gross receipts from the economic revitalization project. Ninety (90) days after the filing of the tax return of the approved company, the Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth shall certify to the authority for the preceding fiscal year of an approved company for which a return was filed with respect to an economic revitalization project of the approved company the state tax liability of the approved company receiving inducements under KRS 154.26-015 to 154.26-100 and the amount of any tax credits taken pursuant to this section;

The agreement shall provide that the term shall not be longer than the earlier of:

The date on which the approved company has received inducements or withheld assessments equal to the amount that the company may recover under paragraph (a) of this subsection; or

Ten (10) years from the date of the execution of the later of the agreement or supplemental project agreement;

Prior to execution of the agreement or supplemental project agreement, the eligible company shall secure from all local governmental authorities responsible for collecting local occupational license fees one (1) of the following:

A resolution or order of the local governmental entities acknowledging and consenting to the termination or partial termination of the receipt of local occupational license fees paid by the approved company on behalf of its employees to the local government entities resulting from the execution of the agreement or supplemental project agreement; or

In lieu of the credit against the local occupational license fee, an appropriation agreement with the authority and the local governmental entities by which the local governmental entities will appropriate funds in an amount equal to the amount of the credit of the local occupational license fee for the benefit of the approved company in a manner consistent with the applicable state laws;

If more than one (1) local occupational license fee is imposed upon the employees of the approved company, the assessment imposed upon the employees shall be credited against the local occupational license fee and shall be apportioned to each local occupational license fee according to each local occupational license fee’s proportion to the total of all local occupational license fees for such employees. No credit, or portion thereof shall be allowed against any local occupational license fee imposed by or dedicated solely to a local board of education;

If in any fiscal year of the approved company during which the agreement or supplemental project agreement is in effect the total of the tax credits granted to the approved company plus the assessment collected from the wages of the employees exceeds the expended portion of the amount that the approved company may recover under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the approved company shall pay the excess to the Commonwealth as income tax;

If in any fiscal year of the approved company during which the agreement or supplemental project agreement is in effect the assessment collected from the wages of the employees exceeds the expended portion of the amount that the approved company may recover under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the assessment collected from the wages of the employees shall cease for the remainder of that fiscal year of the approved company, the approved company shall resume normal personal income tax and occupational license fee withholdings from the employees’ wages for the remainder of that fiscal year, and the approved company shall remit to the Commonwealth and applicable local jurisdictions their respective shares of the excess assessment collected on the withholding filing date for employees’ wages next succeeding the first date when the approved company collected excess assessments; and

All proceeds of any loan or other financing incurred in connection with the economic revitalization project shall be expended by the approved company within five (5) years from the date of the agreement. In the event that all proceeds of any loan or other financing incurred in connection with the economic revitalization project are not fully expended within the five (5) year period, the authorized inducements shall automatically be reduced to and shall not be greater than the amount of proceeds actually expended by the approved company within the five (5) year period.

If the approved company elects to utilize the assessment as prescribed in KRS 154.26-100, it shall not assess the wages of an employee who is party to an individual employment contract with the approved company.

Neither the appropriation agreement, nor the agreement, nor the supplemental project agreement shall be transferable or assignable by the approved company without the expressed written consent of the authority.

In addition to the inducements permitted by this section, an approved company with a supplemental project agreement executed pursuant to this section may also qualify for the sales and use tax exemption established by KRS 139.480 for its purchase and use of any property to be incorporated into the construction, rebuilding, modification, or expansion of a blast furnace or any of its components or appurtenant equipment or structures as part of the approved supplemental project.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 359, § 10, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 25, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 47, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 547, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 18, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2004, ch. 105, § 12, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 582, effective June 20, 2005; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 57, effective June 28, 2006; 2012, ch. 119, § 3, effective July 12, 2012; 2014, ch. 129, § 4, effective July 15, 2014.

154.26-095.
Authority and Department of Revenue to report to Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

By July 1, 2019, and by each July 1 thereafter, the authority and the Department of Revenue shall jointly provide a report to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue for each project approved under this subchapter. The report shall contain the following information:

The name of each approved company and the location of each economic revitalization project;

The amount of approved costs for each economic revitalization project;

The date the agreement was approved;

Whether an assessment fee authorized by KRS 154.26-100 was a part of the agreement;

The number of employees employed in manufacturing, the number of employees employed in coal mining and processing, or the number of employees employed in agribusiness operations;

Whether the project was a supplemental project; and

By taxable year, the amount of tax credit claimed on the taxpayer’s return, any amount denied by the department, and the amount of any tax credit remaining to be carried forward.

HISTORY:
2018 ch. 171, § 95, effective April 14, 2018; enacted by 2018 ch. 207, § 95, effective April 27, 2018; 2019 ch. 151, § 67, effective June 27, 2019.

154.26-100.
Job revitalization assessment fee — Certification of tax liability of approved company.

The approved company may require that each employee subject to the income tax imposed by KRS 141.020, whose job was preserved or created as a result of the project or supplemental project, as a condition of employment or the retention of employment, agree to pay an assessment, not to exceed, during any fiscal year of the approved company, five percent (5%) of the gross wages of each employee subject to the income tax imposed by KRS 141.020 whose job was retained or created as a result of the project or supplemental project, unless:

The appropriation agreement is consummated, in which case the assessment shall be four percent (4%) of each employee’s gross wages subject to the income tax imposed by KRS 141.020;

The local government or governments in which the project is located have a local occupational license fee of less than one percent (1%) and agree to forgo all of their local occupational license fee, in which case the assessment shall equal four percent (4%) plus the percentage of the local occupational license fee that the local government or governments have agreed to forgo; or

The local government or governments in which the project is located have no occupational license fee, in which case the assessment shall be four percent (4%).

Each assessed employee shall be entitled to a credit against his Kentucky income tax required to be withheld under KRS 141.310 in the form of a simultaneous adjustment equal to four-fifths (4/5) of the assessment, unless:

The appropriation agreement is consummated, in which case the credit shall be equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the assessment;

The local government or governments in which the project or supplemental project is located have a local occupational license fee of less than one percent (1%) and agree to forgo all of their local occupational license fee, in which case the credit shall be equal to the total assessment less the local occupational license fee; or

If the local government or governments in which the project or supplemental project is located have no local occupational license fee, in which case the credit shall be equal to one hundred percent (100%) of the assessment.

Each assessed employee also shall be entitled to a credit against his local occupational license fee in the form of a simultaneous adjustment of his local occupational license fee withholding equal to one-fifth (1/5) of the assessment, unless:

The appropriation agreement is consummated; or

The local occupational license fee is less than one percent (1%), in which case the credit shall equal the same amount as the local occupational license fee.

If an approved company shall elect to impose the assessment as a condition of employment or the retention of employment, it shall deduct the assessment from each paycheck of each employee subject to subsections (2) and (3) of this section.

Any approved company collecting an assessment as provided in subsection (1) of this section shall make its payroll books and records available to the authority at such reasonable times as the authority shall request, and shall file with the authority the documentation respecting the assessment the authority may require.

Any assessment of the wages of the employees of an approved company pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall permanently lapse upon expiration or termination of the agreement.

By October 1 of each year, the Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth shall certify to the authority, in the form of an annual report, aggregate tax credits claimed on tax returns filed during the fiscal year ending June 30 of that year and job revitalization assessment fees taken during the prior calendar year by approved companies with respect to their economic revitalization projects and supplemental projects under this subchapter, and shall certify to the authority, within ninety (90) days from the date an approved company has filed its state tax return, when an approved company has taken tax credits equal to its total inducements.

History.
Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 359, § 11, effective July 14, 1992; 1994, ch. 450, § 26, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 194, § 48, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 300, § 22, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 547, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2004, ch. 18, § 2, effective July 13, 2004; 2004, ch. 105, § 13, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 85, § 583, effective June 20, 2005; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 2, § 1, effective June 28, 2006; 2014, ch. 129, § 5, effective July 15, 2014.

154.26-101.
Short title for KRS 154.26-010 to 154.26-100.

KRS 154.26-010 to 154.26-100 shall be known as the Kentucky Industrial Revitalization Act.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 194, § 44, effective July 15, 1996.

154.26-110.
Application to approved company of KRS 154.26-080 and 154.26-090.

If the authority gives its preliminary approval designating an eligible company and authorizing the undertaking of an economic revitalization project prior to July 15, 1996, and the authority by final approval approves the eligible company as an approved company and the project of the eligible company as an economic revitalization project, and the authority and the eligible company enter into a revitalization agreement no later than June 30, 1997, then the approved company shall not be subject to KRS 154.26-080 and 154.26-090(1) and shall be subject to KRS 154.26-080 and 154.26-090(1) as in effect prior to July 15, 1996.

History.
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 194, § 49, effective July 15, 1996.

154.26-115.
Options for companies with preliminary approval or final agreement before July 13, 2004.

If, prior to July 13, 2004, the authority has given its preliminary approval designating an eligible company as a preliminarily approved company and authorizing the undertaking of an economic revitalization project, but has not entered into a final agreement with the company, the company shall have the one-time option to:

Operate under the existing agreement as preliminarily approved; or

Request the authority to amend the agreement to comply with the amendments to KRS 154.26-090, 154.26-100, and 141.310 in 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 18, secs. 1, 2, 4, and 5.

If, prior to July 13, 2004, the authority has entered into a final agreement with an eligible company, and if the final agreement is still in effect, the company shall have the one-time option to:

Operate under the existing final agreement; or

Request the authority to amend only the employee assessment portion of the final agreement to comply with the amendment to KRS 154.26-100 in 2004 Ky. Acts ch. 18, sec. 2.

History.
Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 18, § 3, effective July 13, 2004; 2019 ch. 151, § 68, effective June 27, 2019.

154.26-120.
Costs of remediation of property as eligible costs.

Costs incurred by an applicant in remediating a property in accordance with KRS 224.1-510 to 224.1-532 shall be considered eligible costs for the purposes of KRS 154.26-010 to 154.26-100.

History.
Enact. Acts 2001, ch. 128, § 13, effective June 21, 2001.

154.26-125.
Costs of certain carbon steel-making operations considered eligible costs.

Costs incurred by an applicant required for the start-up of a blast furnace and related carbon steel-making operations that were idled due to unfairly traded imports of carbon steel shall be considered eligible costs for the purposes of KRS 154.26-010 to 154.26-100.

HISTORY:
2016 ch. 109, § 3, effective July 15, 2016.